Rhode Island statutes. Title 31 Motor and Other Vehicles
Chapter 19.3 Regulation of Rental of Motorized Bicycles, Motor Scooters and Motorized Tricycles in New Shoreham

31-19.3-1.
Purpose.

The general assembly recognizes the importance of establishing procedures and standards for the supervision and regulation of the rental of motorized bicycles, motor scooters and motorized tricycles in the town of New Shoreham. The establishment of these procedures and standards is declared to be a reasonable exercise of the police power of the general assembly and necessary to afford protection against the increasing number and severity of accidents involving motorized bicycles, motor scooters and motorized tricycles, the noise, and the traffic congestion that their presence creates within the town. The general assembly further declares that it is in the interest of the public health, safety, and welfare that the rental of motorized bicycles, motor scooters and motorized tricycles in the town of New Shoreham be supervised, regulated, and controlled in accordance with the provisions of this chapter.

History of Section.

P.L. 1984 (s.s.), ch. 457, § 1; P.L. 2006, ch. 11, § 5; P.L. 2006, ch. 12, § 5.

31-19.3-2.
Definitions.

As used in this chapter:

“Motorized bicycles” has the meaning set forth in §

31-1-3(n)

.

“Motorized tricycles” has the meaning set forth in §

31-1-3(p)

.

“Motor scooters” has the meaning set forth in §

31-1-3(r)

.

History of Section.

P.L. 1984 (s.s.), ch. 457, § 1; P.L. 2004, ch. 6, § 15; P.L. 2006, ch. 11, § 5; P.L. 2006, ch. 12, § 5.

31-19.3-3.
License required.

No person, firm, or corporation shall offer for rent or lease or allow to be rented or leased any motorized bicycle, motor scooter or motorized tricycle within the town of New Shoreham, unless and until the town council of the town of New Shoreham issues a license in accordance with the provisions of this chapter. However, any person, firm, or corporation holding a license to rent or lease motorized bicycles, motor scooters or motorized tricycles which has been issued by the department of revenue shall be permitted to continue to operate pursuant to the license; provided, that upon the expiration of the license, the person, firm, or corporation shall be required to comply with the provisions of this chapter in order to rent or lease motorized bicycles, motor scooters or motorized tricycles within the town of New Shoreham.

History of Section.

P.L. 1984 (s.s.), ch. 457, § 1; P.L. 2000, ch. 109, § 66; P.L. 2006, ch. 11, § 5; P.L. 2006, ch. 12, § 5; P.L. 2008, ch. 98, § 15; P.L. 2008, ch. 145, § 15.

31-19.3-4.
License application.

Any person requesting a license under this chapter shall apply for it to the town council of the town of New Shoreham upon a form specifying any information that the town council shall require. The town council may require, with the application or otherwise, information relating to the applicant’s solvency, financial standing, insurance coverage, or any other matter which the town council may deem pertinent to safeguard the public interest, all of which shall be considered by the council in determining the fitness of the applicant to be licensed pursuant to this chapter.

The license shall be valid, unless sooner revoked or suspended, until the end of the calendar year of the year in which issued. This license shall be renewable on or after the first of each year.

Any license issued by the town council of the town of New Shoreham under provisions of this chapter may set forth:

The type of vehicle which the licensee is authorized to rent or lease.

The location of the premises from which the license holder is authorized to rent or lease the vehicles.

The total number of motorized bicycles and/or motorized tricycles which the license holder is authorized to rent or lease.

The name and address of the license holder.

History of Section.

P.L. 1984 (s.s.), ch. 457, § 1.

31-19.3-5.
Ordinances.

The town council of the town of New Shoreham may enact reasonable ordinances establishing procedures and standards for the licensing, supervision, regulation, and control of the rental of motorized bicycles, motor scooters and motorized tricycles.

An ordinance enacted pursuant to this section may:

Establish a fee to be charged for the issuance or renewal of any license for the rental of motorized bicycles, motor scooters and/or motorized tricycles the holder of the license is authorized to rent or lease and shall not exceed the sum of forty dollars ($40.00) per motorized bicycle, motor scooters or motorized tricycle.

Establish a maximum number of licenses which may be granted for the rental of motorized bicycles, motor scooters and/or motorized tricycles.

Establish hours during which motorized bicycles, motor scooters and/or motorized tricycles may be rented.

Establish a maximum number of motorized bicycles, motor scooters and/or motorized tricycles which a license holder may rent or lease under the license.

Provide that no motorized bicycle, motor scooters or motorized tricycle shall be rented or leased in the town of New Shoreham unless the operator thereof has a valid license issued under the provisions of §

31-10-1

, or a similar license issued by a state other than Rhode Island.

Require all motorized bicycles, motor scooters and/or motorized tricycles to pass inspection annually and be issued a certificate by a duly authorized state inspection facility indicating that the vehicle has passed inspection to be conducted at inspection agencies which shall be created and governed by rules and regulations promulgated by the department of revenue.

History of Section.

P.L. 1984 (s.s.), ch. 457, § 1; P.L. 1992, ch. 158, § 1; P.L. 1992, ch. 159, § 1; P.L. 1995, ch. 399, §§ 1, 2; P.L. 1996, ch. 404, § 33; P.L. 2006, ch. 11, § 5; P.L. 2006, ch. 12, § 5; P.L. 2008, ch. 98, § 15; P.L. 2008, ch. 145, § 15.

31-19.3-6.
Denial, suspension, or revocation of license.

The license provided for pursuant to this chapter may be denied, suspended, or revoked on any of the following grounds:

Proof of unfitness of the applicant;

Material misstatement of the applicant in the application for a license;

Violation of any provisions of this chapter or of the provisions of any ordinance established by the town council enacted pursuant to the provisions of this chapter.

History of Section.

P.L. 1984 (s.s.), ch. 457, § 1.

31-19.3-7.
Denial of license hearing.

The town council of the town of New Shoreham may, without prior notice, deny any application for a license within thirty (30) days of the receipt of the application, by written notice to the applicants stating grounds for the denial. On request by the applicant who has been denied a license, the town council of the town of New Shoreham shall set the time and place of a hearing upon the denial, and it shall hear the denial with reasonable promptness.

History of Section.

P.L. 1984 (s.s.), ch. 457, § 1.

31-19.3-8.
Hearing on suspension or revocation of license.

No license shall be suspended or revoked except after a hearing. The town council shall give the licensee at least five (5) days written notice of the time and place of the hearing together with the statement of grounds for the proposed action.

History of Section.

P.L. 1984 (s.s.), ch. 457, § 1.

31-19.3-9.
Records of council.

The town council shall keep minutes of its proceedings showing the vote of each member upon any question or, if absent or failing to vote, indicating that fact, and shall keep records of its examinations and other official actions, all of which shall be filed immediately in the office of the town clerk and shall be a public record.

History of Section.

P.L. 1984 (s.s.), ch. 457, § 1.

31-19.3-10.
Appeals to superior court.

Any person, firm, or corporation aggrieved by a decision of the town council pursuant to §

31-19.3-6

or

31-19.3-7

may appeal to the superior court for Washington County by filing a complaint setting forth the reasons of appeal within twenty (20) days after the decision has been filed in the office of the town clerk. The town council shall file the original documents acted upon by it and constituting the record of the case appealed from, or certified copies of them, together with any other facts that may be pertinent, with the clerk of the court within ten (10) days after being served with a copy of the complaint. When the complaint is filed by someone other than the original applicant or appellant, the original applicant or appellant and the members of the town council shall be made parties to the proceedings. The appeal shall not stay proceedings upon the decision appealed from, but the court may, in its discretion, grant a stay on appropriate terms and make any other orders that it deems necessary for an equitable disposition of the appeal.

If, before the date set for the hearing in the superior court, application is made to the court for leave to present additional evidence before the town council and it is shown to the satisfaction of the court that the additional evidence is material and that there were good reasons for the failure to present it at the hearing before the town council, the court may order that the additional evidence be taken before the town council upon conditions determined by the court. The town council may modify its findings and decision by reason of the additional evidence and shall file that evidence and any modifications, new findings, or decisions with the superior court.

The review shall be conducted by the superior court without a jury. The court shall consider the record of the hearing before the town council and if it shall appear to the court that additional evidence is necessary for the proper disposition of the matter, it may allow any party to the appeal to present the evidence in open court, which evidence along with the record shall constitute the record upon which the determination of the court shall be made.

The court shall not substitute its judgment for that of the town council as to the weight of the evidence on questions of fact. The court may affirm the decision of the town council or remand the case for further proceedings, or may reverse or modify the decision if substantial rights of the appellant have been prejudiced because of findings, inferences, conclusions or decisions which are:

In violation of constitutional, statutory, or ordinance provisions;

In excess of the authority granted to the town council by statute or ordinance;

Made upon unlawful procedure;

Affected by other error of law;

Clearly erroneous in view of the reliable, probative, and substantial evidence of the whole record; or

Arbitrary or capricious or characterized by abuse of discretion or clearly unwarranted exercise of discretion.

History of Section.

P.L. 1984 (s.s.), ch. 457, § 1.